apertium-oc-es/apertium-oc-es.oc.metadix
    <pardef n="/aver__vbhaver">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auriam</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auriái</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auriatz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auriás</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aurián</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auriá</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aurem</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aurei</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auretz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auràs</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>auràn</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aurà</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avent</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avent</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèrem</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèri</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèretz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguères</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèron</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèt</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajam</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajam</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>agegam</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aja</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aja</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajatz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajatz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantem"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aja</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aja</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cante"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajan</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ajan</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantant"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aver</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aver</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avé</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__ac"/> 
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>avé</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aviam</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aviái</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aviatz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aviás</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avián</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aviá</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèssem</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèsse</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>aguèssi</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèssetz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèsses</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguèsson</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguès</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>aguèsse</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agut</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguda</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aguts</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>agudas</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avèm</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ai</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>avètz</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>as</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>aver<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 

    <e lm="aver">
        <i></i> 
        <par n="/aver__vbhaver"/> 
    </e>
